Utah statutes.
41-6a-711.   Following another vehicle -- Safe distance -- Exceptions.

(1)  The operator of a vehicle:

(a)  may not follow another vehicle more closely than is reasonable and prudent, having regard for the:

(i)  speed of the vehicles;

(ii)  traffic upon the highway; and

(iii)  condition of the highway; and

(b)  shall follow at a distance so that at least two seconds elapse before reaching the location of the vehicle directly in front of the operator's vehicle.

(2)  Subsection (1)(b) does not apply to funeral processions or to congested traffic conditions resulting in prevailing vehicle speeds of less than 35 miles per hour.

